Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Fire Escapes

§ 35-9-501.
Required in private and public buildings; specifications generally; notices as to location to be posted.

Every building now or hereafter used, in whole or in part, as a public building, public or private institution, office building, lyceum, church, theater, public hall, place of assemblage or place of public resort, and every hotel, apartment house, boarding house, tenement house, factory or workshop, three (3) or more stories in height, school and hospital building, two (2) or more stories in height, shall be provided with safe and suitable metallic, tunnel, iron or fireproof ladders or stair fire escapes with guard rail of sufficient strength, attached to the outside walls thereof and extending from or suitably near the ground to the uppermost story thereof, with platforms not less than six by three (6 x 3) feet and of such shape and size and in such proximity to the windows of each story above the first, as to render access to such ladders or stairs from each such story easy and safe to the occupants of such building, in case of fire; and it shall be the duty of every proprietor, custodian, superintendent or person or persons having charge and control of such public buildings mentioned and described herein, to post notices in every hall, and in a public and conspicuous place in such building, designating the places on each and every floor of such building where such fire escapes are located and may be found.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 1; 1919, ch. 74, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3659; R.S. 1931, § 44-101; C.S. 1945, § 45-301; W.S. 1957, § 35-455.

Cross references. —

As to authority of commissioner of labor to enforce laws relating to fire escapes, see §

27-1-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of landlord to one using fire escape for other than intended purpose, 12 ALR2d 217.

§ 35-9-502.
Means of exit; doors.

Every building now or hereafter used, in whole or in part, as a public building, public or private institution, office building, lyceum, church, school house, theater, picture show house, public hall, place of assemblage or place of public resort, and every hotel, apartment house, boarding house or tenement house, two (2) stories or less in height, having twelve (12) or more rooms shall be provided with at least two (2) stairways, hallways or means of exit or escape from each story in case of fire. In addition to the above mentioned and described stairways and hallways or means of exit, all doors to every public hall, lyceum, theater, picture show house, or other place of amusement, which is thrown open to and used for the profit of the owner or proprietor or owners or proprietors by public assemblies in the state of Wyoming, shall not be less than three (3) feet in width, and shall swing or open out of and not into said public hall, lyceum, theater, picture show house, or other place of amusement.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3660; R.S. 1931, § 44-102; C.S. 1945, § 45-302; W.S. 1957, § 35-456.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring doors to open outward, see §

27-1-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of agreement exempting operator of amusement facility from liability for personal injury or death of patron, 54 ALR5th 513.

§ 35-9-503.
Factories, offices and other buildings to be equipped.

Every building now or hereafter used, in whole or in part, as a factory, mill, workshop, garage, office, bakery, laundry, store, and any other building or buildings in which people are employed at manual or other labor, shall be provided with proper and sufficient means of escape in case of fire, by two (2) or more ways of egress, and all doors leading into or to such factory, mill, workshop, garage, office, bakery, laundry, store, and any other building or buildings in which people are employed at manual or other labor, shall not be locked, bolted or fastened during working hours as to prevent free and easy access therefrom.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3661; R.S. 1931, § 44-103; C.S. 1945, § 45-303; W.S. 1957, § 35-457.

§ 35-9-504.
Exits to be unobstructed; stairways to be lighted.

All such metallic, iron or fireproof ladders or stair fire escapes, stairways, hallways or means of egress, mentioned or described in this act [§§

35-9-501

to

35-9-507

], shall at all times be kept free from any obstruction, in good repair and ready for use; and at night, or where lights are necessary in the daytime, a red light shall be provided with the words inscribed thereon “FIRE ESCAPE”. Provided, that on all hotel, theater, school and hospital buildings, two (2) or more stories in height, said stairways shall extend from each floor of said building to the ground and shall not be less than three (3) feet wide; the risers of said stairs shall not be greater than eight (8) inches, and the treads not less than ten (10) inches wide; and the platform not less than three (3) feet wide, and in all cases the full width of the stairs. All such stairs shall have proper guard rails not less than twenty-eight (28) inches high. Where tubing is used for guard rails they shall be not more than ten (10) inches apart; and where balusters are used they shall be not more than six (6) inches apart.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 3662; R.S. 1931, § 44-104; C.S. 1945, § 45-304; W.S. 1957, § 35-458.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring handrails on stairs, see §

27-1-102

.

§ 35-9-505.
Applicability; fire and safety drills required in schools; supervision of drills.

This chapter shall apply to the trustees of school districts in this state.

In every public and private school in Wyoming, there shall be a fire drill at least once every month. Safety drills may be used in lieu of fire drills if approved by and coordinated with the local fire department provided fire drills are conducted at each school not less than four (4) times during any one (1) academic year and further provided the school’s fire alarm is tested at each fire or safety drill. A safety drill includes any organized response to a potential threat to the health and safety of the student population. The school administration shall supervise and administer this subsection and shall determine the types of safety drills appropriate for each school. In localities where a paid fire department is maintained, a fire department member shall be requested to be in attendance at each fire or safety drill conducted within a school for the purpose of instruction and constructive criticism.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 3663; R.S. 1931, § 44-105; Laws 1939, ch. 60, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 45-305; W.S. 1957, § 35-459; Laws 2000, ch. 89, § 1.

§ 35-9-506.
Penalty.

Every person, firm or corporation, or his or its agents, officers, directors or trustees, owning or having the management or control of any such buildings or structures herein mentioned or described, who shall fail, neglect or refuse to comply with the provisions of this act [§§

35-9-501

through

35-9-507

] not later than October first, nineteen hundred seventeen, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than three (3), nor more than six (6) months, or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each month or fraction thereof in which any building designated in this act shall remain in violation thereof shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3664; R.S. 1931, § 44-106; C.S. 1945, § 45-306; W.S. 1957, § 35-460.

§ 35-9-507.
Applicability to cities and towns.

The provisions of W.S.

35-9-501

through

35-9-507

shall not be applicable in any incorporated city or town that has by ordinance adopted a uniform building code which provides among other things adequate and safe means of inside fire escapes, smoke towers and fireproof inclosed stairways and further fixes the types of occupancies and types of buildings subject to the said code.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 18, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3665; R.S. 1931, § 44-107; C.S. 1945, § 45-307; Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-461.